Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.334

Temporary worker housing—Definition.

For the purposes of RCW 43.70.335, 43.70.337, and 43.70.340, "temporary worker housing" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.114A.020.

[ 1999 c 374 s 9.]